apertium-yid.yid.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Yiddish

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular
# <du>     # Dual

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS

Nouns
Numbers
Number
Punctuation


PATTERN Determiners

DetRoot(1) [ <det>: ] DetRoot(2)

PATTERN Nouns

# Simple nouns (sg and pl forms only)
NounRoot(1) [<n>:] NounRoot(3) [<sg>:]              # singular
NounRoot(1):NounRoot(2) [<n>:] NounRoot(3) [<pl>:]  # plural


PATTERN Numbers

NumRoot [<num>:]

###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

LEXICON NounRoot(3)

# Singular                 Plural                  Gender        Gloss
אַפּריל:אַפּריל                :אַפּרילן                 <m>:          # "April"
אַרבעט:אַרבעט                :אַרבעטן                 <f>:          # "work; job"
אַרבעט:אַרבעט                :אַרבעטס                 <f>:          # "work; job"  #Dir/LR
אָקטאָבער:אָקטאָבער            S                       <m>:          # "October"
אױגוסט:אױגוסט              N                       <m>:          # "August" CHECK: PL in N?
אײַזנבאַן:אײַזנבאַן            N                       <F>:          # "railroad"
בּאַן:בּאַן            N                       <F>:          # "train, railroad"
בּאַרג:בּאַרג            UML                       <M>:          # "mountain"
בּױם:בּ%{ױ%}ם            UML_ER                       <M>:          # "tree" plural with ײ
באַפֿעלקערונג:באַפֿעלקערונג            N                       <F>:          # "population"
בוך:בוך            UML_ER                       <N>:          # "book"
געלט:געלט            UML_ER                       <N>:          # "money"  NOTE: no umlaut [possible]
געשיכטע:געשיכטע            S                       <F>:          # "history"
דעצעמבער:דעצעמבער            S                       <M>:          # "December"
דעצעמבער:דעצעמבער            S                       <M>:          # "December"
דרום:דרום            NOPL                       <M>:          # "south"
הימל:הימל            N                       <M>:          # "heaven"
היסטאָריע:היסטאָריע            S                       <F>:          # "history"
הױז:הױז            UML_ER                       <N>:          # "house" plural with ײַ
זון:זון            N                       <F>:          # "sun"
זון:זון            UML                       <M>:          # "son"
חסיד:חסיד            HEB                       <M>:          # "khosid (Hassid)"
חתונה:חתונ            HEB                       <F>:          # "wedding"
טאָג:טאָג            UML                       <M>:          # "day"
טאָכטער:טאָכטער            UML                       <F>:          # "daughter"
טײל:טײל            N                       <F>:          # "part"
יאַנואַר:יאַנואַר            N                       <M>:          # "January"
יאָר:יאָר            N                       <M>:          # "year"
יולי:יולי            S                       <M>:          # "July"
יוני:יוני            S                       <M>:          # "June"
ייִד:איד            N                       <M>:          # "Jew" ! Dir/LR
ייִד:ייִד            N                       <M>:          # "Jew"
ישיבה:ישיב            HEB                       <F>:          # "yeshiva"
לאַן:לאַן            N                       <M>:          # "meadow"
לאַנד:לאַנד            UML_ER                       <N>:          # "country, land"
לעבן:לעבן            S                       <N>:          # "life"
מאַרץ:מאַרץ            N                       <M>:          # "March"
מזרח:מזרח            NOPL                       <M>:          # "east"
מיטן:מיטן            S                       <M>:          # "middle"
מלחמה:מלחמ            HEB                       <F>:          # "war"
מענטש:מענטש            N                       <M>:          # "human; mentsh, gentleman"
מערבֿ:מערבֿ            NOPL                       <M>:          # "west"
מײַ:מײַ            N                       <N>:          # "May" CHECK: PL in N?
נאָמען:נאָמען            UML                       <M>:          # "name"  ! FIXME: irreg alternative plural נעמענער
נאָװעמבער:נאָװעמבער            S                       <M>:          # "November"
סטאַנציע:סטאַנציע            S                       <F>:          # "station"
סעפּטעמבער:סעפּטעמבער            S                       <M>:          # "September" CHECK: PL in S?
ספֿר:ספֿר            HEB                       <M>:          # "seyfer (religious book)"
פּאָיעזד:פּאָיעזד            N                       <M>:          # "train"
פֿאָטער:פֿאָטער            S                       <M>:          # "father"
פֿעברואַר:פֿעברואַר            N                       <M>:          # "February" CHECK: PL in N?
פֿרײַנד:פֿרײַנד            NULL                       <M>:          # "friend"
צוג:צוג            N                       <M>:          # "train"
צפֿון:צפֿון            NOPL                       <M>:          # "north"
צײַט:צײַט            N                       <F>:          # "time"
קאַלענדאָר:קאַלענדאַר            N                       <M>:          # "calendar"
קינד:קינד            UML_ER                       <N>:          # "child" (technically no umlaut)
קריג:קריג            N                       <F>:          # "war"
רבֿ:רבֿ            HEB_N                       <M>:          # "rov (rabbi)" (pl: rabonem)
רבי:רבי            REBE                       <M>:          # "rebe (rabbi)"
רעגירונג:רעגירונג            N                       <F>:          # "government"
שטאַט:שטאַט            N                       <M>:          # "state"
שטאָט:שטאָט            UML                       <F>:          # "city"
שװעסטער:שװעסטער            NULL                       <F>:          # "sister"
תּורה:תּורה            NOPL                       <F>:          # "Torah (Hebrew bible)"
װאַסער:װאַסער            N                       <N>:          # "water"
װעג:װעג            N                       <M>:          # "way"
װעלט:װעלט            N                       <F>:          # "world"

!FIXME: how to deal with words like the following (compounds, plural on first word)
!בית החיים   ! "cemetery"
!בית הקברות  ! "cemetery"
!בית עולם    ! "cemetery"
!בית עלמין   ! "cemetery"


LEXICON DetRoot(2)

דער:דער      <def><m><nom>    # "the"
דער:דעם      <def><m><acc>    # "the"
דער:דעם      <def><m><dat>    # "the"
דער:די       <def><f><nom>    # "the"
דער:די       <def><f><acc>    # "the"
דער:דער      <def><f><dat>    # "the"
דער:דאָס      <def><nt><nom>   # "the"
דער:דאָס      <def><nt><acc>   # "the"
דער:דעם      <def><nt><dat>   # "the"
אַ:אַ          <idf><sg>        # "a"
אַ:אַן         <idf><sg>        # "an"   # Dir/LR
קײן:קײן      <idf><sg>        # "a/an, no, any"

#מײַן:מײַן DET-PERS-P1SG ;
#דײַן:דײַן DET-PERS-P2SG ;
#זײַן:זײַן DET-PERS-P3SGMN ;
#איר:איר DET-PERS-P3SGF ;
#אונדזער:אונדזער DET-PERS-P1PL ;
#אײַער:אײַער DET-PERS-P2PL ;
#זײער:זײער DET-PERS-P3PL ;

#װעלך:װעלך DET-ITG ; ! "which"
#אַלע:אַלע DET-QNT ; ! "all"
#אַ% סך:אַ% סך DET-QNT ; ! "a lot"
#אַ% סך:אַסאַך DET-QNT ; ! "a lot"
#עטלעכע:עטלעכע DET-QNT ; ! "some (a few)"


LEXICON NumRoot

אײנס:אײנס        # FIXME: counting 1
אײן:אײן          # FIXME: number one; also TODO: inflected forms of אײן
צװײ:צװײ               # "two"
דרײַ:דרײַ               # "three"
פֿיר:פֿיר               # "four"
פֿינף:פֿינף             # "five"
זעקס:זעקס             # "six"
זיבן:זיבן             # "seven"
אַכט:אַכט               # "eight"
נײַן:נײַן               # "nine"
צען:צען               # "ten"
עלף:עלף               # "eleven"
צװעלף:צװעלף           # "twelve"
דרײַצן:דרײַצן           # "thirteen"
פֿערצן:פֿערצן           # "fourteen"
פֿופֿצן:פֿופֿצן           # "fifteen"
זעכצן:זעכצן           # "sixteen"
זיבעצן:זיבעצן         # "seventeen"
אַכצן:אַכצן             # "eighteen"
נײַנצן:נײַנצן           # "nineteen"
צװאַנציק:צװאַנציק       # "twenty"
דרײַסיק:דרײַסיק         # "thirty"
פֿערציק:פֿערציק         # "forty"
פֿופֿציק:פֿופֿציק         # "fifty"
זעכציק:זעכציק         # "sixty"
זיבעציק:זיבעציק       # "seventy"
אַכציק:אַכציק           # "eighty"
נײַנציק:נײַנציק         # "ninety"
הונדערט:הונדערט       # "hundred"
טויזנט:טויזנט         # "thousand"    # FIXME: plural טױזנטער
מיליאָן:מיליאָן         # "million"     # FIXME: plural מיליאָנען



PATTERN Number
Numeral [<num>:]

LEXICON Numeral
/([0123456789])+/
/([0123456789])+[.,]([0123456789])+/

LEXICON Punctuation

᥅<sent>:᥅
॥<sent>:॥
᥄<sent>:᥄
।<sent>:।
᥀<sent>:᥀
.<cm>:.

.<cm>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:? 
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/


# Resources:
# https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
